Hawaii statutes.
[PART I.
GENERALLY]

Law Journals and Reviews

Avoiding the Next Hokuli‘a: The Debate over Hawai‘i's
Agricultural Subdivisions. 27 UH L. Rev. 441 (2005).

§205-1 Establishment of the commission.
There shall be a state land use commission, hereinafter called the commission.
The commission shall consist of nine members who shall hold no other public
office and shall be appointed in the manner and serve for the term set forth in
section 26-34. One member shall be appointed from each of the counties and the
remainder shall be appointed at large; provided that one member shall have
substantial experience or expertise in traditional Hawaiian land usage and
knowledge of cultural land practices. The commission shall elect its
chairperson from one of its members. The members shall receive no compensation
for their services on the commission, but shall be reimbursed for actual
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Six affirmative votes
shall be necessary for any boundary amendment.

The commission shall be a part of the
department of business, economic development, and tourism for administration
purposes, as provided for in section 26-35.

The commission may engage employees necessary
to perform its duties, including administrative personnel and an executive
officer. The executive officer shall be appointed by the commission and the
executive officer's position shall be exempt from civil service. Departments
of the state government shall make available to the commission such data,
facilities, and personnel as are necessary for it to perform its duties. The
commission may receive and utilize gifts and any funds from the federal or
other governmental agencies. It shall adopt rules guiding its conduct,
maintain a record of its activities and accomplishments, and make
recommendations to the governor and to the legislature through the governor. [L
1963, c 205, pt of §2; Supp, §98H-1; HRS §205-1; am L 1975, c 193, §2; am L
1976, c 43, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 336, §7; am L 1990, c 293, §8; gen ch
1993; am L 2006, c 296, §1]

Cross References

Commission placed in department of business, economic
development, and tourism, see §26-18.

Commissions, generally, see §26-34.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next